enum.depconv.foma
def LooseChainConstraint  ?* - ?* [ [    "}" | R9 ] [ L - L9 | "}" ] | 
    			            [? - "}" - R9 ] [ L9           ] ] ?*;
def CycleEdges  ?*          
             -  [ ?* Rright          [ Rbslash & NonInverted ] ?* ] 
             -  [ ?* Rleft           [ Rgt     & NonInverted ] ?* ] 
             -  [ [ ?* - ?* Rright ] [ Rbslash &    Inverted ] ?* ] 
             -  [ [ ?* - ?* Rleft  ] [ Rgt     &    Inverted ] ?* ] ;
def TwoTurnEdges ?*
             -  [ ?* Left2           [ Rbslash &   NotAlmost ] ?* ]
             -  [ ?* Right2          [ Rgt     &   NotAlmost ] ?* ]
             -  [ [ ?* - ?* Left2  ] [ Rbslash &      Almost ] ?* ]
             -  [ [ ?* - ?* Right2 ] [ Rgt     &      Almost ] ?* ] ;

def RegBigrams  ExpandSigma(Design);
def RegLat   RemoveBoundaries(LocalLanguage( [ TRANSNeighbors & R L & RegBigrams ] | [ RegBigrams - R L ]))  
             & CycleEdges & TwoTurnEdges & LooseChainConstraint ;

################
# VISUALIZATIONS
################
regex Reg;  
#view                                         # Uncomment to see the Reg in Figure 3
regex S "->" [ Pairs .o. (? 0:S ? 0:S) ].2;  
#print words                                  # Uncomment to see the Dyck grammar
regex RemoveBoundaries(LocalLanguage( TRANSNeighbors | ? "$"));
#view                                         # Uncomment to see (almost) Figure 4 
# It is almost:  it does not even accept the string  /F' >F' because it does not read 
# pairs of brackets but individual bracket symbols, changing states after the first.

#############
# UNIT TESTS:
#############
echo 
echo ************* UNIT TESTS FOR REG **************
# There should not be any difference between Design and Examples
regex [ Design - Examples ] | [ Examples - Design ];
print words
echo Reg derived from one of these has 4 states:
regex Reg;
echo
echo ************* UNIT TESTS FOR FIGURE 4 **************
echo TransBracket has 56 states, 108 arcs, 54 paths.
regex TRANSBrackets;
echo Pairs have 55 pairs of brackets + 1 empty string = 56 paths
regex Pairs;
echo sigma has 110 symbols
regex sigma;
echo TEST 1: sigma and SIGMA must coincide: 0 states and 0 transitions:
regex     [ SIGMA - sigma ] | [ sigma - SIGMA ];
echo
echo ************* TEST BIGRAM COVERAGE ***************
def XTEST  WB  |
   "/V'" "/F'" "{" "}" ">F'" "<1" "{" "}" "\\1" "/2" "{" "}" ">2" "<E" "/F'" "{" "}" ">F'" "/F" "{" "}" ">F" "\\E" ">V'" |
   "/F'" "/F'" "<f'" "{" "}" "\\f'" "/1" "{" "}" ">1" "<2" "{" "}" "\\2" ">F'" "{" "}" ">F'" |
   "/F'" "{" "}" "/." "/F'" "{" "}" ">F'" "/F" "{" "}" ">F" ">." "{" "}" ">F'" |
   "<I'" "/V'" "/F'" "{" "}" ">F'" "<1" "{" "}" "\\1" "/2" "{" "}" ">2" ">V'" "/P" "{" "}" ">P" "\\I'" |
   "[I'" WB "]I'" |
   "/F'" WB ">F'" "<1" WB "\\1" |
   "{" "}" "{" "}" "/." "{" "}" ">." |
   "[I'" "{" "}" "]I'" "/0" "{" "}" ">0" "/A" "<f'" "{" "}" "\\f'" "<f" "{" "}" "\\f" ">A" |
   "<f'" "/F'" "{" "}" ">F'" "<1" "{" "}" "\\1" "<C" "/F'" "{" "}" ">F'" "/F" "{" "}" ">F" "\\C" "\\f'" |
   "[I'" "<f'" "{" "}" "\\f'" "/1" "{" "}" ">1" "/c" "<f'" "{" "}" "\\f'" "<f" "{" "}" "\\f" ">c" "]I'" |
   "[I'" "/F'" "{" "}" ">F'" "<1" "{" "}" "\\1" "/C" "[I'" "{" "}" "]I'" "<0" "{" "}" "\\0" ">C" "]I'" |
   "{" "}" "/." "{" "}" ">." "<." "{" "}" "\\." ;
regex Bigrams(XTEST) - Bigrams(RegLat) ;
echo the following should be empty list of bigrams:
echo **********************************
print words
echo **********************************
echo


# This uses the YJ&GR method to generate A174687 (out oriented trees)
# (WEAK(X) does not do anything.)
def WEAK(X) X;
def B1  WEAK([ G1 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
def B2  WEAK([ G2 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
def B3  WEAK([ G3 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
def B4  WEAK([ G4 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
def B5  WEAK([ G5 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
def B6  WEAK([ G6 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
#def B7  WEAK([ G7 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
#                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
#def B8  WEAK([ G8 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
#                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
#def B9  WEAK([ G9 .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
#                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
#def B10  WEAK([ GA .o. RegLat .o. OUT .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o.
#                                         T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1);
#exit




# Achievement 1:  PDA producing weak bracketing
###############################################

# This produces an automaton that shows the inside of the loop in language C in Figure 2
def LSplit  ( "[" ) ( "[":"[!" "[":"[0"* );
def RSplit  ( "]":"]0"* "]":"]!" ) ( "]" );
def Split   ( LSplit "{" "}" RSplit )*;
regex Split.2;
#view
#dot > dot-split.dot
#exit
#/ / { } > { } >
def LSplit  ( "[" | "<" | "/"  ) ( [ "[":"[!" | "<":"<!" | "/":"/!"   ]  ( "[":"[0" | "<":"<0" | "/" :"/0"  )* );
def RSplit  ( ( "]":"]0" | ">":">0" | "\\":"\\0" )* [ "]":"]!" | ">":">!" | "\\":"\\!" ]  ) ("]" | ">" | "\\") ;
def Split   ( LSplit "{" "}" RSplit )*;
#def RSplit ">";

# This the relation T4 implementing the Dyck language
def R    "{"  "}"   -> 0,
       	 "<"  "\\0" -> 0,    	 "<0" "\\"  -> 0,	 "<!" "\\!" -> 0,
       	 "/"  ">0"  -> 0,    	 "/0" ">"   -> 0,	 "/!" ">!"  -> 0,
       	 "["  "]0"  -> 0,    	 "[0" "]"   -> 0,	 "[!" "]!"  -> 0;

# This is transducer E 
def Z    "/0" | "[0" | "<0" | "\\0" | "]0" | ">0" -> 0;

def SURF(X)  [ X .o. Map.i ].2;
def WEAK(X)  [ [ [X .o. Map.i .o. Split].2 .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. ("{" "}")* ].1 .o. Z ].2;

# projective trees in weak bracketing
def B1  [ G1 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
def B2  [ G2 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
def B3  [ G3 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
def B4  [ G4 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
def B5  [ G5 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
def B6  [ G6 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
#def B7  [ G7 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
#def B8  [ G8 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
#def B9  [ G9 .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;
#def B10  [ GA .o. RegLat .o. PROJW .o. ACYCD .o. CONNW .o. OUT .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. T55 .o. 0 ].1;

def OPT(X) [WEAK(X)];
regex OPT(B1);
regex OPT(B2);
regex OPT(B3);
regex OPT(B4);
regex OPT(B5);
regex OPT(B6);
#regex OPT(B7);
#regex OPT(B8);
#regex OPT(B9);
#regex OPT(B10);

def OPT(X) [WEAK(X) .o. [ "<!" | "/!" -> "[!"]].2;
regex OPT(B1);
regex OPT(B2);
regex OPT(B3);
regex OPT(B4);
regex OPT(B5);
regex OPT(B6);
#regex OPT(B7);
#regex OPT(B8);
#regex OPT(B9);
#regex OPT(B10);

regex B6 .o. Map.i .o. Split .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. R .o. 0;
#exit

# Achievement 7:  Kielioppi joka tuottaa madallettuja sulutuksia
################################################################

# Tämä kielioppi olettaa, että ! on uloimman sisaren ominaisuus

def LLL  [ [ "[" | "<" | "/" ]  [ "{" "}" ]+ ]* ;
def RRR  [ [ "{" "}" ]+ [ "]" | "\\" | ">" ] ]* ;
def RU   "<!" ( "<0" | "[0" | "/0" )* RRR ("{" "}")* LLL ( ">0" | "]0" | "\\0" )* "\\!" -> "{" "}",
         "/!" ( "<0" | "[0" | "/0" )* RRR ("{" "}")* LLL ( ">0" | "]0" | "\\0" )* ">!"  -> "{" "}",
	 "[!" ( "<0" | "[0" | "/0" )* RRR ("{" "}")* LLL ( ">0" | "]0" | "\\0" )* "]!"  -> "{" "}";
def  grammar [ RU .o. RU .o. RU .o. ("{" "}")* ].1;
# Tämän kieliopin ongelma on, että se voi tuottaa myös sellaisia sulutuksia kuin
#   [ [ {} ] ]  =>  [! {} ] ]!
#

# S → ( [S′] | {} )*,
# S′→ {} ( [S′] | {} )* | [S′] ( [S′] | {} )+

# S   → ( [! S′  ]! | {} )*
# S′  → ( [0 U   ]  | {} ) ( [! S′  ]! | {} )* ( [  T   ]0 | {} ) | {}
# U   → ( [0 U   ]  | {} ) ( [! S′  ]! | {} )* ( [! S'  ]! | {} ) | {}              
# T   → ( [! S′  ]! | {} ) ( [! S′  ]! | {} )* ( [  T   ]0 | {} ) | {}

# S   → S′*
# S′  → {} |                [!    {}    ]!
#          |                [! U  S′* T ]! 
# U   → {} |    {} S'* ]  (       S′+   ] )* 
# T   → {} |              ( [     S′+     )*  [ S'* {} 

# Grammar for digraphs
def Ba  "[" | "]" | "[!" | "]!" | "<" | "<!" | "/" | "/!" | ">" | ">!" | "\\" | "\\!";
def RBa "]" | ">" | "\\";
def LBa "[" | "<" | "/";
def GU  "{" "}" ["{" "}"|S]* RBa [["{" "}"|S]+ RBa ]* | "{" "}"; 
def GT  [ LBa ["{" "}"|S]+]* LBa ["{" "}"|S]* "{" "}" | "{" "}";
def G   [ [ "[!" GU ["{" "}"|S]* GT  "]!" | "[!" "{" "}"  "]!"
          | "<!" GU ["{" "}"|S]* GT "\\!" | "<!" "{" "}" "\\!"
	  | "/!" GU ["{" "}"|S]* GT  ">!" | "/!" "{" "}"  ">!" ]:0 0:S | ? ]* ;

def AG01 [ [ Ba* "{" "}" Ba* ]^1 .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. ["{" "}"|S]* ].1;
def AG02 [ [ Ba* "{" "}" Ba* ]^2 .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. ["{" "}"|S]* ].1;
def AG03 [ [ Ba* "{" "}" Ba* ]^3 .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. ["{" "}"|S]* ].1;
def AG04 [ [ Ba* "{" "}" Ba* ]^4 .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. ["{" "}"|S]* ].1;
def AG05 [ [ Ba* "{" "}" Ba* ]^5 .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. ["{" "}"|S]* ].1;
def AG06 [ [ Ba* "{" "}" Ba* ]^6 .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. ["{" "}"|S]* ].1;
def AG07 [ [ Ba* "{" "}" Ba* ]^7 .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. G .o. ["{" "}"|S]* ].1;
#exit

# Grammar for graphs
# S   → S′*
# S′  → {} |                [!    {}    ]!
#          |                [! U  S′* T ]! 
# U   → {} |    {} S'* ]  (       S′+   ] )* 
# T   → {} |              ( [     S′+     )*  [ S'* {} 

def Ba  "[" | "]" | "[!" | "]!";
def GU  "{" "}" S* "]" [ S+ "]" ]* | "{" "}"; 
def GT  [ "[" S+ ]* "[" S* "{" "}" | "{" "}";
def G   [ [ "[!" GU S* GT "]!" | "[!" "{" "}" "]!" | "{" "}" ]:0 0:S | ? ]* | S*:0 ;

def Ba  "[" | "]" | "[!" | "]!";
def GU  "{" "}" ["{" "}"|S]* "]" [ ["{" "}"|S]+ "]" ]* | "{" "}"; 
def GT  [ "[" ["{" "}"|S]+ ]* "[" ["{" "}"|S]* "{" "}" | "{" "}";
def G   [ [ "[!" GU ["{" "}"|S]* GT "]!" | "[!" "{" "}" "]!" ]:0 0:S | Ba | "{" | "}" ]* ;
